pt-PT: Nível de resistência ao fluxo de ar: Ajustável; Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
ko: 공기 흐름 저항 수준: 조절식; 높음; 낮음; 중간; 기타
zh-TW: 氣流阻力等級: 可調; 高; 低; 中; 其他
it: Livello di resistenza al flusso d'aria: Regolabile; Alto; Basso; Medio; Altro
th: ระดับความต้านทานการไหลของอากาศ: ปรับได้; สูง; ต่ำ; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
en: Airflow resistance level: Adjustable; High; Low; Medium; Other
nb: Luftstrømsmotstandsnivå: Justerbar; Høy; Lav; Middels; Annet
sk-SK: Úroveň odporu prúdenia vzduchu: Nastaviteľná; Vysoká; Nízka; Stredná; Iná
bg-BG: Ниво на съпротивление на въздушния поток: Регулируемо; Високо; Ниско; Средно; Друго
el: Επίπεδο αντίστασης στη ροή αέρα: Ρυθμιζόμενη; Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μεσαία; Άλλο
es: Nivel de resistencia al flujo de aire: Ajustable; Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otro
pt-BR: Nível de resistência ao fluxo de ar: Ajustável; Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
fi: Ilmavirran vastustaso: Säädettävä; Korkea; Matala; Keskitaso; Muu
sl-SI: Raven zračne upornosti letala: Nastavljiva; Visoka; Nizka; Srednja; Drugo
lt-LT: Oro srauto pasipriešinimo lygis: Reguliuojamas; Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Kita
cs: Úroveň odporu proudění vzduchu: Nastavitelná; Vysoká; Nízká; Střední; Jiná
tr: Hava akışı direnci seviyesi: Ayarlanabilir; Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
sv: Nivå av luftmotstånd: Justerbar; Hög; Låg; Medium; Annan
fr: Niveau de résistance au passage de l’air: Réglable; Élevé; Faible; Moyen; Autre
de: Luftströmungswiderstand: Einstellbar; Hoch; Niedrig; Mittel; Sonstige
hr-HR: Razina otpora zraka: Prilagodljivo; Visoko; Nisko; Srednje; Ostalo
da: Luftmodstandsniveau: Justerbar; Høj; Lav; Mellem; Andet
ja: 空気抵抗レベル: 調整可能; 高; 低; 中; その他
vi: Mức độ kháng lực luồng khí: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cao; Thấp; Trung bình; Khác
pl: Poziom oporu przepływu powietrza: Regulowany; Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Inny
ro-RO: Nivelul de rezistență la fluxul de aer: Ajustabil; Ridicat; Scăzut; Mediu; Altele
ru: Уровень сопротивления воздушному потоку: Регулируемое; Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другое
zh-CN: 气流阻力等级: 可调节; 高; 低; 中; 其他
nl: Niveau luchtweerstand: Verstelbaar; Hoog; Laag; Gemiddeld; Overig
hu: Légáramlásellenállási szint: Állítható; Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb